Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 6
COMMERCIAL DRIVING SCHOOLS

Editor's note:

This part 6 was added with relocations in 2017. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

42-2-601. Definitions.

As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commercial driving instructor" means an individual who has been employed by a commercial driving school.

"Commercial driving school" means any business or any person who, for compensation, provides or offers to provide instruction in the operation of a motor vehicle, with the exceptions of secondary schools and institutions of higher education offering programs approved by the department of education and private occupational schools offering programs approved by the private occupational school division. The term shall not include any motorcycle operator safety training program established pursuant to section 43-5-502.

"Department" means the department of revenue.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 17-224), ch. 179, p. 657, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-15-101 as it existed prior to 2017.

42-2-602. Equipment of vehicles.

Every motor vehicle used by a commercial driving school in the conduct of its course of driver training shall be equipped as follows:

The vehicle shall be equipped as provided in article 4 of this title 42.

The vehicle shall be equipped with dual controls on the foot brake that will enable the commercial driving instructor to bring the car under control in case of emergency.

The vehicle shall have an outside rear vision mirror on the commercial driving instructor's side of the vehicle.

The vehicle shall be equipped with four-way emergency flashers.

The vehicle shall be equipped with seat belts for the operator of the vehicle and for the commercial driving instructor.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 17-224), ch. 179, p. 658, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-15-114 as it existed prior to 2017.

42-2-603. Rules.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules as necessary to carry out the provisions of this part 6.

Specifically, the department shall have power to adopt rules upon the following matters:

Prescribe the content of courses of instruction;

Prescribe the type of equipment to be used in said courses of instruction;

Prescribe records to be kept by a commercial driving school;

Prescribe the form of contracts and agreements used by commercial driving schools.

In adopting the rules, the department shall use the guidelines concerning commercial driving schools promulgated by the United States department of transportation.

Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with section 24-4-103.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 17-224), ch. 179, p. 658, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-15-116 as it existed prior to 2017.

42-2-604. Violations - penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this part 6 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than thirty days, or by both fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 17-224), ch. 179, p. 658, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-15-120 as it existed prior to 2017.